Arkansas, session 2025, SB460.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 8-4-314 is amended to read as follows:
8-4-314. Compliance Advisory Panel — Small Business Stationary Source
Technical and Environmental Compliance Assistance Program — Marketing
Recyclables Program.
(a) There is created a Compliance Advisory Panel composed of nine (9)
seven (7) individuals.
(b) The panel shall consist of:
(1) Two (2) members appointed by the Governor to represent the
general public who are not:
(A) Owners owners or representatives of owners of small
business stationary sources; or
(B) Owners or representatives of owners of a recycling
company or the marketing and recyclable community;
(2) Three (3) Two (2) members selected by the Speaker of the
*JMB236*
04-02-2025 14:28:26 JMB236

As Engrossed: H4/2/25 SB460
House of Representatives:
(A) One (1) member who is an owner who are owners or who
represents an owner represent owners of small business stationary sources;
and
(B) Two (2) members who are owners or representatives of a
small business recycling company or the marketing and recyclable community;
(3) Three (3) Two (2) members selected by the President Pro
Tempore of the Senate:
(A) One (1) member who is an owner who are owners or who
represents an owner represent owners of small business stationary sources;
and
(B) Two (2) members who are owners or representatives of a
small business recycling company or the marketing and recyclable community;
and
(4) One (1) member selected by the Director of the Division of
Environmental Quality who shall serve as a nonvoting member except when his
or her vote is needed to break a tie vote.
(c)(1) Each member shall serve a term of four (4) years.
(2) In the event of a vacancy in the membership of the panel
concerning a member selected by the General Assembly or the Governor, the
Governor shall appoint a person meeting the applicable eligibility
requirements of the vacated position to fill the vacancy for the remainder of
the unexpired term.
(3)(2) In the event of a vacancy in the membership of the panel
concerning the member appointed by the director, the director shall appoint a
person to fill the vacancy for the remainder of the unexpired term.
(d)(1)(A) The panel shall hold at least one (1) regular meeting each
calendar year quarter at a time and place determined by the panel.
(B) At least one (1) meeting each calendar year shall be
dedicated to small business stationary sources, with an emphasis on air
quality issues.
(2) Special meetings may be called at the discretion of the
chair.
(e)(1) The panel shall select a chair by a majority vote of the
membership.
(2) Each chair shall serve a term of one (1) year.
04-02-2025 14:28:26 JMB236

As Engrossed: H4/2/25 SB460
(f) Five (5) Four (4) members of the panel shall constitute a quorum
to transact business.
(g) The members of the panel may receive expense reimbursement in
accordance with § 25-16-901 et seq.
(h)(1) If a vacancy occurs in an appointed position for any reason,
the vacancy shall be filled by appointment by the official who made the
appointment.
(2) The new appointee shall serve for the remainder of the
unexpired term.
(i) The panel shall perform the following duties for the Small
Business Stationary Source Technical and Environmental Compliance Assistance
Program:
(1) Render advisory opinions concerning the effectiveness of the
Small Business Stationary Source Technical and Environmental Compliance
Assistance Program program, difficulties encountered, and degree and severity
of enforcement;
(2) Make periodic reports to the Administrator of the United
States Environmental Protection Agency concerning the compliance of the Small
Business Stationary Source Technical and Environmental Compliance Assistance
Program program with the requirements of the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980,
the Regulatory Flexibility Act, 5 U.S.C. § 601 et seq., and the Equal Access
to Justice Act, 5 U.S.C. § 504, 28 U.S.C. § 2412, and 42 U.S.C. § 1988;
(3) Review information for small business stationary sources to
assure such information is understandable by the layperson; and
(4) Have the Small Business Stationary Source Technical and
Environmental Compliance Assistance Program program serve as the secretariat
for the development and dissemination of such reports and advisory opinions.
(j) The panel shall perform the following duties for the Marketing
Recyclables Program:
(1) Develop a program for the coordination of all existing
marketing programs for recyclables;
(2) Work with existing industry to encourage the use of
recyclables in their manufacturing processes;
(3) Recruit new industries that use recyclables in their
manufacturing processes;
(4) Maintain current information on market prices and trends;
04-02-2025 14:28:26 JMB236

As Engrossed: H4/2/25 SB460
and
(5) Advise and assist state and local officials in all areas of
recyclables marketing, including without limitation the implementation,
administration, and funding of the collection and recycling or collection and
disposal of extra-large tires as defined in § 8-9-402.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 8-6-607 is amended to read as follows:
8-6-607. Collection of fees.
(a) On or before January 15, April 15, July 15, and October 15 of each
year, each landfill permittee and each solid waste transporter shall:
(1) Submit to the Division of Environmental Quality a quarterly
report that accurately states the total weight or volume of solid waste
received at the landfill or transported out of state during the quarter just
completed; and
(2) Pay to the division the full amount of disposal and
transportation fees imposed and collected under this subchapter for the
preceding quarter.
(b)(1) Except as provided in subdivisions (b)(2) and (3) of this
section, the disposal and transportation fees collected under this section
shall be special revenues and deposited into the State Treasury to the credit
of the Solid Waste Management and Recycling Fund for administrative support
of the Compliance Advisory Panel.
(2) Twenty-five percent (25%) of the disposal fees collected
under subsection (a) of this section from landfills in which a private
industry bears the expense of operating and maintaining the landfill solely
for the disposal of wastes generated by the private industry shall be
deposited quarterly into the Marketing Recyclables Program Fund Division of
Environmental Quality Fee Trust Fund for administrative support of the
Compliance Advisory Panel.
(3) Except for the disposal fees deposited into the Marketing
Recyclables Program Fund Division of Environmental Quality Fee Trust Fund
under subdivision (b)(2) of this section, before disbursing moneys to the
regional solid waste management boards, the division shall deposit the
following moneys into the following funds each fiscal year:
(A) One hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) into the
Crime Information System Fund to be used exclusively for the scrap metal
04-02-2025 14:28:26 JMB236

As Engrossed: H4/2/25 SB460
logbook program; and
(B) Three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) into the
Arkansas Unpaved Roads Program Fund.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 19-5-1011(c), concerning the Crime
Information System Fund, is amended to read as follows:
(c) Beginning July 1, 2013, excluding the disposal fees that are to be
deposited into the Marketing Recyclables Program Fund Division of
Environmental Quality Fee Trust Fund under § 8-6-607(b)(2), the first one
hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) of fees collected each fiscal year
under § 8-6-607 shall be deposited into the State Treasury and credited to
the Crime Information System Fund to be used exclusively for the scrap metal
logbook program.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 19-5-1137 is amended to read as follows:
19-5-1137. Division of Environmental Quality Fee Trust Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the "Division of Environmental Quality Fee Trust Fund".
(b) The Division of Environmental Quality Fee Trust Fund fund shall
consist of those special revenues as specified in:
(1) Section § 19-6-301(104), there to be used to defray the
costs of operating the Division of Environmental Quality as set out in §§ 8-
1-101 — 8-1-107; and
(2) Section 8-6-607(b), there to be used for the administrative
support of the Compliance Advisory Panel.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 19-6-301, concerning the enumeration of
special revenues, is amended to add an additional subdivision to read as
follows:
(277) Disposal and transportation fees as specified in § 8-6-
607(b)(1) for administrative support of the Compliance Advisory Panel.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 19-6-471 is repealed.
19-6-471. Marketing Recyclables Program Fund.
The Marketing Recyclables Program Fund shall consist of those special
04-02-2025 14:28:26 JMB236

As Engrossed: H4/2/25 SB460
revenues as specified in § 19-6-301(162), there to be used by the Compliance
Advisory Panel for the Marketing Recyclables Program for the administration
and performance of its duties, as administered by the Division of
Environmental Quality under § 8-9-201 et seq.

SECTION 7. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the effectiveness of this act
is essential to prudent operation of the Division of Environmental Quality;
that delay in the effective date could work irreparable harm on the proper
administration of government programs; and that this act is immediately
necessary to ensure that the appropriate funds are available to administer
the government programs of the Division of Environmental Quality. Therefore,
an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary
for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become
effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

/s/Irvin













04-02-2025 14:28:26 JMB236